Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-302
Mineral rights; who may acquire.

Any person or association of persons, corporate or otherwise, desiring to obtain the right to prospect for and develop the minerals or valuable substances upon or in any of the public lands or waters of the state, except oil and gas, may do so under the provisions of sections 72-301 to 72-314. It shall be unlawful to prospect upon or in any of such public lands or waters without a lease or for anyone to interfere with the functions and duties of the state surveys having in charge the investigations of the natural resources of the state. The Conservation and Survey Division of the University of Nebraska at the request of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall make investigations and reports concerning state lands.

Laws 1918, Thirty-sixth Spec. Sess., c. 7, § 2, p. 43;

C.S.1922, § 5220;

C.S.1929, § 72-302;

Laws 1943, c. 164, § 14, p. 584;

R.S.1943, § 72-302;

Laws 1969, c. 592, § 1, p. 2444;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 44.